Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-315
Occupation taxes; collection;
venue of action.

The Attorney General, on request of the
Secretary of State, shall institute such action to recover occupation taxes in the district
court of Lancaster County or
any other county in the state in which such corporation has an office or place
of business.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 15, p. 750;

R.S.1913, § 775;

C.S.1922, § 693;

C.S.1929, § 24-1715;

R.S.1943, § 21-315;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 248.
January 1, 2016